Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4
D

EVELOPMENT OF CHATTAHOOCHEE RIVER BASIN

Cross references.

- Historic Chattahoochee Compact,

§

12-10-80

et seq.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Chattahoochee Basin Downstream Assistance (CBDA) Grant Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Grant Programs, Sec. 391-3-21-06.

12-5-400. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Chattahoochee River Basin Act."

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 805, § 1.)

12-5-401. Purpose.

It shall be the purpose of the Department of Natural Resources under this part to encourage and promote the expansion and development of the full economic, industrial, and recreational potential of the Chattahoochee River and its tributaries. By way of illustration and not of limitation, the department shall encourage and promote the development of navigation to Atlanta, trade and other commercial facilities, flood control, water supply, pollution abatement, hydroelectric power generation, recreation, protection and propagation of fish and wildlife, and the proper flow of dam-controlled water discharges.

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 805, § 3.)

12-5-402. Powers and duties of department.

In carrying out its purposes under this part, the department shall have the following powers:

To administer all funds available to the department under this part;

To accept any grant of funds made by the United States government or any agency thereof for the purpose of carrying out any of its functions under this part;

To accept gifts, bequests, devises, and endowments to be used in carrying out the purposes of this part;

To act either independently or jointly with any other state department or with any commission, board, or institution of the state in order to carry out its powers and duties under this part;

To request from the various state departments and other agencies and authorities of the state and its political subdivisions and their agencies and authorities such available information as it may require in its work. All such agencies and authorities shall within a reasonable time furnish such requested available information to the department;

To make such recommendations and reports to the Governor and to the General Assembly as it deems necessary or advisable, in addition to the annual report required as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section;

To contract with political subdivisions of the State of Georgia and with private persons and corporations pursuant to its functions under this part;

To do all other things necessary and proper to exercise its powers and perform its duties to effectuate the purposes of this part.

The department shall have the following duties under this part:

To formulate, in cooperation with other state agencies, agencies of the United States government, and interested organizations and citizens of the State of Georgia, a comprehensive program and plan for the development of the Chattahoochee River Basin;

To submit an annual report of its activities under this part and recommendations to the Governor and to notify the members of the General Assembly of the availability of the annual report and recommendations in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 805, §§ 4, 6; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1505; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 7/SB 49.)